Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Licensing of Psychologists.

Administrative Code. —

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 60, art. 3.

Sec. 08.86.120.
Entitlement to licensure. [Repealed, § 9 ch 63 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 08.86.125.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.86.130.
Licensing requirements.

The board shall issue a psychologist license to a person who

holds an earned doctorate degree, from an academic institution whose program of graduate study for a doctorate degree in psychology meets the criteria established by the board by regulation, in

clinical psychology;

counseling psychology; or

education in a field of specialization considered equivalent by the board;

has not engaged in dishonorable conduct related to the practice of counseling or psychometry;

has one year of post doctoral supervised experience approved by the board; and

takes and passes the objective examination developed or approved by the board.

The board may not deny recognition as an accredited or approved academic institution to an educational institution solely because its program has not been accredited by a professional organization of psychologists.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 08.86.135.
Temporary license.

The board may issue a temporary license to a person who meets the requirements of AS

08.86.130(a)(1)

and (2). A temporary license issued under this section is valid only for the time period identified in the person’s plan for the purpose of obtaining supervised experience to meet the requirements of AS

08.86.130(a)(3)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 38 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

Sec. 08.86.140.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for the following:

application;

examination;

credential review;

initial license;

license renewal.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 49 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For license duration and renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

Sec. 08.86.150.
License by credentials.

A person who is licensed or certified as a psychologist by a licensing authority other than the state is entitled to be licensed in the state without examination if the person applies on the proper application form, submits proof of continued competence as required by regulation of the board, pays the credential review fee, and the person

holds a doctoral degree with primary emphasis on psychology that satisfies the requirements of AS

08.86.130

and the examination and qualification requirements for the person’s out-of-state license or certificate were essentially similar to or higher than the examination and qualification requirements for licensure under this chapter;

is a diplomate in good standing of the American Board of Professional Psychology; or

is certified or registered with a credentialing organization in psychology approved by the board in regulation and with requirements essentially similar to or higher than the requirements for licensure under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 10 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 36 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.